Utah statutes.
26-25-5.   Violation of chapter a misdemeanor -- Civil liability.

(1)  Any use, release or publication, negligent or otherwise, contrary to the provisions of this chapter is a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not relieve the person or organization responsible for such use, release, or publication from civil liability.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

